District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
22 act may be cited as the “Fair Hiring Opportunities for Public Employment (HOPE) Amendment
23 Act of 2025”.
24 Sec. 2. Title 6-B is amended as follows:
25 (a) Section 212 (6-B DCMR § 212) is amended as follows:
26 (1) Subsection 212.1 is amended by striking the phrase “or foster care youth
27 preference” and inserting the phrase “foster care youth preference, or qualifying transitional
28 employment program graduate preference” in its place.
29 (b) A new section 216 is added to read as follows:
30 “216 QUALIFYING TRANSITIONAL EMPLOYMENT PROGRAM GRADUATE
31 EMPLOYMENT PREFERENCE
32 “216.1 An individual who applies for a competitive appointment or promotion, meets the

33 qualifications of the position to which they have applied, and has graduated from Project
34 Empowerment or a similar transitional employment program through the Department of
35 Employment Services (DOES) or other District agency will qualify for a transitional
36 employment program graduate employment preference and shall be awarded a ten (10)-point
37 hiring preference.
38 “216.2 All job postings shall inform District candidates of their eligibility for any
39 applicable transitional employment program graduate hiring preference. Such job postings shall
40 also inform candidates of the programs for which completion currently grants eligibility for the
41 hiring preference.
42 “216.3 DCHR shall annually identify all programs providing hiring preference eligibility
43 and communicate the list of eligible programs to agency employers. Agency employers shall
44 include this list in all relevant job postings.
45 “216.4 Applicants who claimed transitional employment program graduate preference
46 shall furnish proof of eligibility in a manner prescribed by the personnel authority.”
47 (c) A new section 416-a is added to read as follows:
48 “416-a CRIMINAL HISTORY REPORTS AND RELEVANCE SCREENS
49 “416-a.1 (a) The program administrator shall request a criminal history report that
50 includes only convictions and pending criminal charges. If the criminal history report includes
51 extraneous information not limited to convictions and pending criminal charges, the program
52 administrator shall extract any convictions and pending criminal charges.
53 “(b) If no convictions or pending criminal charges remain, nothing in the criminal
54 history may prevent the applicant from passing the enhanced suitability screening.
55 “416-a.2 (a) Initial determinations of unsuitability should be made based on convictions

56 bearing a reasonable, direct connection to the responsibilities of the role for which the individual
57 has applied. The program administrator shall apply a Relevance Screen to the criminal history
58 report. For each conviction or pending prosecution in the criminal history report, the program
59 administrator shall use the Relevance Screen to determine whether the conviction or pending
60 prosecution is relevant to the duties and responsibilities of that employment position. If it is
61 relevant, then the conviction or pending prosecution shall remain in the report. If it is not
62 relevant, then the conviction or pending prosecution shall be removed from the report.
63 “(b) If no convictions or pending criminal charges remain, nothing in the criminal
64 history may prevent the applicant from passing the enhanced suitability screening. Any
65 remaining convictions or pending criminal charges shall constitute the Relevant Criminal History
66 Report.
67 “416-a.3 (a) The program administrator shall develop a “Relevance Screen” outlining
68 which convictions should be considered in the hiring process for a particular position. The
69 Relevance Screen is used to determine what information in the criminal history report is relevant
70 to the position for which the applicant has been conditionally approved.
71 “(b) To develop a Relevance Screen, the program administrator, in collaboration
72 with the hiring agency representative, shall:
73 “(1) Beginning with the job description for the position, identify which
74 duties and responsibilities contribute to certain risks arising from the nature of the job. The
75 program administrator shall reference the position description, including the enhanced suitability
76 screening designation category (safety, protection, or security sensitive); the brief explanation of
77 the duties and responsibilities supporting the designation; the statement explaining the enhanced
78 suitability screenings required for the position, as required by § 406.6; and Relevance Screen

79 Development Guidance issued by the agency.
80
81 “(2) Apply an appropriate “look back” period within which to consider
82 prior convictions. An appropriate look back period will screen only for convictions that are
83 recent enough to indicate significant risk.
84 “(A) For felonies other than offenses in Guideline Groups 1, 2, or
85 3, a criminal history shall include any convictions for which the sentence was completed not
86 more than 8 years before the date of application for employment.
87 “(B) For misdemeanors, a criminal history shall include any
88 convictions for which the sentence was completed not more than 5 years before the date of
89 application for employment.
90 “(C) Convictions for sex offenses and child abuse or cruelty to
91 children shall not be excluded by the lookback period.
92 “416-a.4 A Relevance Screen should be used when assessing criminal histories for
93 similar positions. A Relevance Screen may be updated periodically.
94 “416-a.5 The program administrator shall endeavor to use the same relevance screen for
95 identical or similar positions.”
96 (d) Section 417 is amended as follows:
97 (1) Subsection 417.1 is amended to read as follows:
98 “417.1 The program administrator shall transmit the Relevant Criminal History
99 Report to the respective hiring agency and conduct a coordinated review with the hiring agency
100 representative. Where the applicant’s Relevant Criminal History Report contains any convictions
101 or pending criminal charges, there shall be a presumption that the applicant remains qualified for

102 the position for which a conditional offer of employment has been extended.”
103 (2) Subsection 417.2 is amended to read as follows:
104 “417.2 The program administrator, in conjunction with the agency hiring
105 representative, shall assess any information in the Relevant Criminal History Report and make an
106 initial determination whether their history would prevent the individual from adequately and
107 faithfully fulfilling the duties and responsibilities of the position for which they have received a
108 conditional offer of employment.”
109 (3) Subsection 417.3 is repealed.
110 (4) Subsection 417.4 is amended to read as follows:
111 “417.4 The program administrator, in conjunction with the hiring coordinator at the
112 respective agency, shall review the Relevant Criminal History Report to produce a written
113 evaluation of an individual’s criminal history to determine whether he or she is suitable for
114 District service. To make this determination, the program administrator shall consider any
115 relevant criminal offense in the context of the specific duties and responsibilities of the position
116 and the bearing, if any, that the relevant convictions or pending prosecutions in the Relevant
117 Criminal History Report has on those duties and responsibilities.
118 “(a) Factors to consider in making this determination shall include:
119 “(1) Whether the position offers the opportunity for the same or a similar offense
120 to occur;
121 “(2) Whether circumstances leading to the conduct for which the person was
122 convicted will recur in the position;
123 “(3) The length of time that has passed since the criminal offense(s);
124 “(4) The age of the individual at the time of the criminal offense(s);

125 “(5) The frequency and seriousness of the criminal offense(s);
126 “(6) Any mitigation information provided by the individual in response to the
127 relevant information in the criminal history report;
128 “(7) Any social or environmental conditions contribution to the offense;
129 “(8) For applicants currently employed by a District agency or participating in a
130 qualifying transitional employment program, agency or program review of the applicant’s prior
131 job performance and demonstrated professional capacity; and
132 “(9) The District’s policy favoring re-entry of ex-offenders into its work force.
133 “(b) For applicants currently serving a District agency in a position newly classified as
134 requiring enhanced suitability screening, applying to a new position within the District
135 government subject to enhanced suitability screening, reappointed to a position within the
136 District government requiring enhanced suitability screening, or applying within District
137 government after completing Project Empowerment or a similar transitional employment
138 program through the Department of Employment Services (DOES) or other District agency,
139 consideration of the agency’s assessment of the applicant’s prior job performance and
140 demonstrated professional capacity is particularly appropriate and should be afforded significant
141 weight.”
142 (e) Section 424 is amended to read as follows:
143 “424 CLARIFYING DEROGATORY INFORMATION
144 “424.1 Whenever a general and enhanced suitability screening reveals derogatory
145 information the program administrator shall:
146 “(a) Notify the individual that there will remain a presumption that the individual remains
147 qualified for the position.

148 “(a-1) Notify the individual as to the source, nature, and potential impact of the
149 derogatory information; and
150 “(b) Allow the individual no less than ten (10) business days and no more than twenty-
151 one (21) calendar days to provide a response, through an in-person interview or written response
152 if not available for an interview, to the derogatory information. The personnel authority may
153 authorize a shorter time period under extraordinary circumstances.
154 “(c) Applicant shall be advised that they may submit a statement with evidence to
155 demonstrate mitigation or rehabilitation, along with any other information the applicant wishes
156 to provide to explain derogatory information found. Along with the applicant’s statement,
157 additional relevant evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation may include letters of
158 recommendation from community members and certificates of completion from programs or
159 education.
160 “424.2 (a) Applicants should be advised that they may request assistance completing a
161 response to information arising from a Relevant Criminal History Report.
162 “(b) Should an applicant request assistance pursuant to 424.2(a), the program
163 administrator shall provide the applicant with a list, including up-to-date contact information, of
164 agencies and local community partner organizations providing assistive career and professional
165 development resources for returning citizens.
166 “(c) The program administrator shall identify and maintain relationships with such
167 partner agencies and organizations, encouraging the provision of supportive resources for the
168 purposes of this subsection.
169 “424.3 When response to derogatory information is received, employers shall hold the
170 position open until review of the applicant’s response is complete.”

171 (f) New sections 425 and 426 are added to read as follows:
172 “425 REVIEW OF APPLICANT RESPONSE TO DEROGATORY INFORMATION
173 “425.1 The program administrator shall respond to an applicant’s response to derogatory
174 information no later than twenty-one (21) calendar days after receipt of written response or after
175 conduction of an in-person interview.
176 “425.2 Evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation may be established by:
177 “(a) Evidence showing that at least one year has elapsed since release from any
178 correctional institution without subsequent conviction of a crime;
179 “(b) Evidence showing compliance with terms and conditions of probation or
180 parole; or
181 “(c) Any other evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation and present fitness
182 provided, including, but not limited to, letters of reference.
183 “425.3 The program administrator and all DCHR staff conducting review of applicant
184 responses to derogatory information shall be required to complete a training in best practices
185 governing trauma-informed evaluations of returning citizen responses on an annual basis.”
186 “426 DETERMINATION OF UNSUITABILITY BASED ON ENHANCED
187 SUITABILITY SCREENING REULTS
188 “426.1 Should the program administrator deem an applicant unsuited for the position to
189 which they have applied based on information contained in the Relevant Criminal History
190 Report, the program administrator shall notify the individual in a formal writing stating:
191 “(a) The final denial or disqualification;
192 “(b) The reason(s) for the determination of unsuitability for the position;
193 “(c) Explanation of the appeals process; and

194 “(d) The earliest date at which the applicant may reapply for a position of employment
195 with the agency.
196 “426.2 DCHR shall submit, at the close of each Council period, a confidential report to
197 the Council which will review the District’s hiring practices in an effort to ensure that people
198 with criminal records are not unreasonably denied employment with the District. This report
199 shall include:
200 “(a) The number of job applicants deemed unsuitable for government employment during
201 an enhanced suitability screening and who have relevant criminal convictions or pending
202 prosecutions;
203 “(b) An anonymized summary of the rationales behind determinations of unsuitability;
204 and
205 “(c) The number of successful appeals for reconsideration of unsuitability.”
206 (g) Section 499 is amended by adding a new definition as follows:
207 “Returning Citizen –– an individual who has been incarcerated for a cumulative period of
208 six (6) months or more during the five (5) years preceding application for employment.”
209 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
210 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
211 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
212 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
213 Sec. 4. Effective date.
214 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
215 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
216 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December

217 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
218 Columbia Register.